Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5268.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) The ombudsman shall prepare and submit a report of the findings of an investigation and make recommendations to the council within not more than 10 business days after completing the investigation if the ombudsman finds any of the following: (a) A matter that should be considered by the department. (b) An administrative act that should be modified or canceled. (c) A statute or rule that should be altered. (d) Administrative acts for which justification is necessary. (e) Significant resident veteran health and safety issues. (f) A report of abuse that has merit. (g) (f) Any other significant concerns. (2) Subject to section 11, the council shall forward the report prepared and submitted under this section to the department, the resident veteran or resident veterans affected, and to the complainant who requested the report. If the report contains a finding that a report of abuse has merit, the council shall also forward the report to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5267 (request no. H04348'25). (b) House Bill No. 5263 (request no. H04349'25). (c) House Bill No. 5269 (request no. H04351'25). (d) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04352'25).